District of Columbia statutes.
16-4427

Appeals.

(a)

An appeal may be taken from:

(1)

An order denying or granting a motion to compel arbitration;

(2)

An order granting a motion to stay arbitration;

(3)

An order confirming or denying confirmation of an award;

(4)

An order modifying or correcting an award;

(5)

An order vacating an award without directing a rehearing; or

(6)

A final judgment entered pursuant to this chapter.

(b)

An appeal under this section shall be taken as from an order or a judgment in a civil action.

History

Feb. 27, 2008, D.C. Law 17-111, § 2(b), 55 DCR 1847

Section References

This section is referenced in § 16-4404 and § 16-4405.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 28 of the Uniform Arbitration Act (2000).